Illinois, session 104th, HB4499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Tortious Interference with Parent-Child Relationship Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) Illinois recognizes the right of every child to 9    the physical, mental, emotional, and financial support of 10    the child's parents. 11        (2) The 14th Amendment of the United States 12    Constitution protects the parent-child relationship 13    through its Due Process Clause, which safeguards the 14    fundamental right of parents to direct the care, custody, 15    and upbringing of their children, and the reciprocal right 16    of children to the society, companionship, and support of 17    their parents. 18        (3) The parent-child relationship is among the most 19    fundamental liberty interests protected by the United 20    States Constitution, and interference with that 21    relationship, whether through injury to the child, injury 22    to the parent, or conduct that prevents the relationship 23    from forming, constitutes a deprivation of   HB4499- 2 -LRB104 17482 JRC 30908 b1    constitutionally protected rights. 2        (4) Section 700 of the Restatement (Second) of Torts 3    has recognized since 1977 that a parent who is entitled to 4    custody of a minor child may maintain a tort action 5    against a person or entity whose tortious conduct 6    interferes with the parent-child relationship. 7        (5) However, in Hulsh v. Hulsh, 2025 IL 130931, the 8    Illinois Supreme Court declined to recognize a common law 9    tort cause of action or recoverable damages for 10    interference with the parent-child relationship in the 11    context of nonfatal injuries and deferred to the General 12    Assembly as to whether such a cause of action and remedy 13    ought to exist. 14        (6) Unlike many other jurisdictions, Illinois 15    currently does not permit a parent to recover damages for 16    loss of a child's society or companionship when the child 17    suffers nonfatal injuries caused by another's tortious 18    conduct, nor does Illinois permit a child to recover for 19    loss of a parent's society or companionship under similar 20    circumstances. 21        (7) This gap in Illinois law fails to adequately 22    protect the constitutionally recognized parent-child 23    relationship and leaves families without remedy when 24    tortious conduct diminishes or destroys that relationship. 25    (b) Therefore, it is the purpose of this Act to promote 26fairness and justice and to protect the constitutionally   HB4499- 3 -LRB104 17482 JRC 30908 b1recognized rights of parents and children to their 2relationship with one another by establishing a statutory 3civil cause of action or remedy, where none has existed under 4Illinois law, for tortious interference with the parent-child 5relationship, including, but not limited to, circumstances in 6which: 7        (1) a child suffers injury caused by the tortious 8    conduct of another resulting in loss or diminishment of 9    the parent-child relationship; 10        (2) a parent suffers injury caused by the tortious 11    conduct of another resulting in loss or diminishment of 12    the parent-child relationship; 13        (3) tortious conduct prevents the formation of a 14    parent-child relationship between persons legally entitled 15    to such a relationship; or 16        (4) tortious conduct that otherwise interferes with, 17    diminishes, or destroys the parent-child relationship. 18    Section 10. Liability for tortious interference with the 19parent-child relationship. 20    (a) A person or entity is subject to liability under this 21Act if that person's or entity's tortious conduct: 22        (1) causes physical, emotional, or psychological 23    injury to a child resulting in loss or diminishment of the 24    parent-child relationship; 25        (2) causes physical, emotional, or psychological   HB4499- 4 -LRB104 17482 JRC 30908 b1    injury to a parent resulting in loss or diminishment of 2    the parent-child relationship; 3        (3) prevents the formation of a parent-child 4    relationship between persons legally entitled to such a 5    relationship; or 6        (4) otherwise interferes with, diminishes, or destroys 7    the parent-child relationship between a parent and child. 8    (b) A parent and child each have an independent right to 9bring an action or to recover damages under this Act for 10interference with their relationship with one another. 11    (c) This Section applies to nonfatal injuries. 12    (d) This Section applies to the parents of a minor child or 13an adult child who is dependent on his or her parents for 14support. 15    (e) This Section also applies to minor children and adults 16who are dependent on their parents for support at the time of 17the alleged injury or conduct. 18    Section 15. Cause of action and recoverable damages. 19    (a) A parent or child whose rights under this Act have been 20violated has a nonwaivable right to bring a civil action 21against the person or entity whose tortious conduct violated 22those rights. 23    (b) A person entitled to bring an action under this Act may 24recover actual damages, including, but not limited to: 25        (1) loss of society;   HB4499- 5 -LRB104 17482 JRC 30908 b1        (2) loss of companionship; 2        (3) loss of consortium; 3        (4) loss of the parent-child relationship; 4        (5) emotional distress; 5        (6) mental anguish; or6        (7) economic loss. 7    (c) If the defendant's conduct demonstrated reckless 8disregard for the rights of the parent or child, a court may 9award punitive damages in accordance with Illinois law. 10    Section 95. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 11its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 12the invalidity of that provision or application does not 13affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 14be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 15    Section 97. Retroactive application. This Act applies to 16all conduct occurring on or after January 1, 1980. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.